Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-144
Disciplinary action; hearing; board; powers.

The board, or any member thereof, may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and may administer oaths, take testimony, hear proofs, and receive exhibits in evidence in connection with or upon hearing under the Public Accountancy Act. In case of disobedience to a subpoena the board may invoke the aid of any court of this state in requiring the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 39, p. 69;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 37.